California statutes. Vehicle Code
(3) The units are loaded in tandem only with respect to length, and the dimension from the front of the forward unit to the rear of the last unit does not exceed the length of vehicles in combination that would otherwise be permitted under this section.

(b) Applications for permits issued pursuant to this section shall specifically describe the manufactured home units to be moved and shall include a written statement of good cause satisfying the requirements of this section.

(c) Permits, other than annual permits, issued pursuant to this section shall describe the particular highways over which the permit is valid and shall be subject to all of the conditions of this article and any additional conditions imposed by the public agency issuing the permit.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1312, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

35790.6.

A permit issued pursuant to Section 35780 or 35790 may authorize an exemption from the height limitations in Section 35250 for manufactured homes, including manufactured homes with a height in excess of 15 feet, measured from the surface upon which the vehicle stands, if the proposed route can accommodate the vehicle.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 350, Sec. 2.   Effective July 15, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

35791.

The Department of Transportation and any local authority may, with respect to such highways as may be agreed upon under their respective jurisdictions which traverse any area within the boundaries of the local authority, contract for the issuance by either authority of a single permit authorizing the operation or movement of a vehicle or a combination of vehicles or special mobile equipment in the same manner as if each authority had issued separate permits pursuant to Section 35780.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 545.)
-------------------------------------------

35795.

(a) (1) The Department of Transportation may charge a fee for the issuance of permits pursuant to this article.

(2) The fee established by the Department of Transportation pursuant to this section shall be established by a regulation adopted pursuant to Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 11371) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and shall be calculated to produce a total estimated revenue that is not more than the estimated
 total cost to that department for administering this article.

(3) Special services necessitated by unusually large or heavy loads requiring engineering investigations, or other services, may be billed separately for each permit.

(4) The funds collected by the Department of Transportation pursuant to this subdivision shall be deposited in the State Highway Account in the State Transportation Fund.

(b) (1) Local authorities may charge a fee for the issuance of permits pursuant to this article. However, the fee established by a local authority pursuant to this section shall be established by ordinance or resolution adopted after notice and hearing. The fee shall be calculated to produce a total estimated revenue that is not more than the estimated total cost incurred by the local authority in
 administering its authority under this article and shall not exceed the fee developed by the Department of Transportation pursuant to subdivision (a). The fee for the issuance of permits shall be developed in consultation with representatives of local government and the commercial trucking industry. Notice of the hearing shall be by publication as provided in Section 6064 of the Government Code. The hearing shall be held before the legislative body of the local authority. All objections shall be considered and interested parties shall be afforded an adequate opportunity to be heard in respect to their objections.

(2) Special services necessitated by unusually large or heavy loads requiring engineering investigations, escorts, tree trimming, or other services, excluding services necessary to provide the notification required under this section and services that are within the scope of the local authority’s ordinary duty to provide, shall be
 billed separately for each permit.

(3) For purposes of determining whether, under paragraph (2), special services are necessitated by an unusually large or heavy load, a local authority shall be governed by the criteria set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 1411.3 of Title 21 of the California Code of Regulations.

(c) Nothing in this section shall limit or restrict the application of Section 35782.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 242, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

35796.

Any or all of the powers granted to local authorities in this article may, by ordinance or resolution, be delegated by such local authorities to the road commissioner or to such other local official as may be performing functions substantially the same as a road commissioner in the county or municipality enacting such ordinance or resolution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 380.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 16. IMPLEMENTS OF HUSBANDRY [36000. - 36800.]



CHAPTER 1. Definitions [36000. - 36017.]

36000.

An “implement of husbandry” is a vehicle which is used exclusively in the conduct of agricultural operations.

An implement of husbandry does not include a vehicle if its existing design is primarily for the transportation of persons or property on a highway, unless specifically designated as such by some other provision of this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 973, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

36005.

An implement of husbandry includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(a) A lift carrier or other vehicle designed and used exclusively for the lifting and carrying of implements of husbandry or tools used exclusively for the production or harvesting of agricultural products, when operated or moved upon a highway.

(b) A trailer of the tip-bed type when used exclusively in the transportation of other implements of husbandry or tools used exclusively for the production or harvesting of agricultural products.

(c) A trailer or semitrailer having no bed, and designed and used solely
 for transporting a hay loader or swather.

(d) A spray or fertilizer applicator rig used exclusively for spraying or fertilizing in the conduct of agricultural operations. This subdivision does not apply to anhydrous ammonia fertilizer applicator rigs which have a transportation capacity in excess of 500 gallons.

(e) (1) A trailer or semitrailer that has a maximum transportation capacity in excess of 500 gallons, but not more than 1,000 gallons, used exclusively for the transportation and application of anhydrous ammonia, if the vehicle is either equipped with operating brakes or is towed upon a highway by a motortruck that is assigned a manufacturer’s gross vehicle weight rating of
 34 ton or more.

(2) These vehicles are subject to Section 24603 if the stoplamps of the towing vehicle are not clearly visible.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, a combination of vehicles is limited to two vehicles in tandem.

(f) A nurse rig or equipment auxiliary to the use of and designed or modified for the fueling, repairing, or loading of an applicator rig or an airplane used for the dusting, spraying, fertilizing, or seeding of crops.

(g) A row duster.

(h) A wagon or van used exclusively for carrying products of farming from
 one part of a farm to another part thereof, or from one farm to another farm, and used solely for agricultural purposes, including any van used in harvesting alfalfa or cotton, which is only incidentally operated or moved on a highway as a trailer.

(i) A wagon or portable house on wheels used solely by shepherds as a permanent residence in connection with sheep raising operations and moved from one part of a ranch to another part thereof or from one ranch to another ranch, which is only incidentally operated or moved on a highway as a trailer.

(j) Notwithstanding subdivision (f) of Section 36101, a trap wagon, as defined in Section 36016, moved from one part of a ranch to another part of the same ranch or from one ranch to another, which is only operated or moved on a highway incidental
 to agricultural operations. The fuel tank or tanks of the trap wagon shall not exceed 1,000 gallons total capacity.

(k) Any vehicle that is operated upon a highway only for the purpose of transporting agricultural products and is in no event operated along a highway for a total distance greater than one mile from the point of origin of the trip.

(l) A portable honey-extracting trailer or semitrailer.

(m) A fertilizer nurse tank or trailer that is not self-propelled and which is moved unladen on the highway and auxiliary to the use of a spray or fertilizer applicator rig.

(n) Any cotton trailer when used on the highways for the exclusive
 purpose of transporting cotton from a farm to a cotton gin, and returning the empty trailer to such farm, except that Section 5014 shall apply to such trailers.

(o) A truck tractor or truck tractor and semitrailer combination specified in this subdivision which is owned by a farmer and operated on the highways, (1) only incidental to a farming operation, (2) not for compensation, and (3) for a distance of not more than two miles (on the highway) each way. This subdivision applies only to truck tractors with a manufacturer’s gross vehicle weight rating over 10,000 pounds that are equipped with all-wheel drive and off-highway traction tires on all wheels, and only to semitrailers used in combination with such a truck tractor and exclusively in production or harvesting of tomatoes. The vehicles specified in this subdivision shall not be operated
 in excess of 25 miles per hour on the highways.

(p) An all-terrain or utility-terrain vehicle used exclusively in agricultural operations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 168, Sec. 3.   (AB 2111)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

36010.

A “farm trailer” is either of the following:

(a) A trailer or semitrailer owned and operated by a farmer in the conduct of agricultural operations, and used exclusively to transport agricultural products upon the highway to the point of first handling and return.

(b) A trailer or semitrailer equipped with rollers on the bed, with a frame not taller than 10 inches high, and with a gross vehicle weight rating of 10,000 pounds or less, that is owned, rented, or leased by a farmer and operated by that farmer in the conduct of agricultural operations, used exclusively to transport fruit and vegetables upon the highway to the point of first handling and return, and that was manufactured and in use prior to January 1, 1997. These vehicles may also be operated on the highways without a load for the purposes of delivering a rented or leased vehicle to the renting or leasing farmer’s farm, or returning empty to the owner’s premises.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 861, Sec. 56.   Effective September 29, 2000.   Operative December 31, 2001, pursuant to Sec. 67 of Ch. 861.)
-------------------------------------------

36011.

An “automatic bale wagon” is a motor vehicle capable of transporting property on a highway and equipped with apparatus specifically designed to pick up single bales of hay or straw from a field and to load and unload baled hay or straw.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 627.)
-------------------------------------------

36012.

A “cotton module mover” is a motortruck, semitrailer, or a truck tractor, in combination with a semitrailer, that is equipped with a self-loading bed and is designed and used exclusively to transport field manufactured cotton modules to a cotton gin.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 641, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

36015.

“Implement of husbandry” includes any farm tractor, otherwise an implement of husbandry used upon a highway to draw a farm trailer carrying farm produce, or to draw any trailer or semitrailer carrying other implements of husbandry, between farms, or from a farm to a processing or handling point and returning with or without the trailer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 2149.)
-------------------------------------------

36016.

A “trap wagon” is a trailer or semitrailer used exclusively in the conduct of agricultural operations to fuel, service, or repair implements of husbandry. A trap wagon may be equipped with tools, spare parts, lubricating supplies, or fuel tanks.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 973, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

36017.

For the exclusive purpose of this division, empty bins, pallets, and tiedown straps shall not be considered a load when transported within the parameters of agricultural operations. Any farm trailer or other vehicle transporting these items shall continue to be regulated pursuant to this division. The total outside width of any of the transported items shall not exceed 102 inches.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 973, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Registration of Implements of Husbandry [36100. - 36130.]

36100.

Implements of husbandry which are only incidentally operated or moved over a highway and implements of husbandry listed in Section 36005 or 36015 are exempt from registration.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 2149.)
-------------------------------------------

36101.

The following farm vehicles are exempt from registration, if they have and display an identification plate as specified in Section 5014, and the vehicles shall not be deemed to be implements of husbandry and they shall be subject to all equipment and device requirements as if registered:

(a) A motor vehicle of a size so as to require a permit under Section 35780 owned and operated by a farmer, designed and used exclusively for carrying, or returning empty from carrying, feed and seed products of farming, and used on a highway between one part of a farm to another part of that farm or from one farm to another farm.

(b) A vehicle equipped with a water tank owned by a farmer and used exclusively to service his or her own implements of husbandry.

(c) A water tank truck that is owned by a farmer, not operated for compensation, and used extensively in the conduct of agricultural operations, when used exclusively (1) for sprinkling water on dirt roads providing access to agricultural fields or (2) transportation of water for irrigation of crops or trees.

(d) (1) A cotton module mover, as defined in Section 36012.

(2) In order to maintain the exemption from registration granted under this subdivision for a truck tractor, when combined with a semitrailer, the owner of that truck tractor shall not operate it during the exemption period in any manner other than as a cotton module mover, as defined in Section 36012, and shall do all of the following:

(A) Register the vehicle with the department before operating it as a commercial motor vehicle.

(B) Apply to the department on a yearly basis for any renewal of the exemption from registration.

(3) Exemption from registration under this subdivision does not exempt a truck tractor, when combined with a semitrailer, operating as a cotton module mover pursuant to Section 36012 and this subdivision from the applicable safety requirements of this code or any regulation adopted pursuant to any statute, including, but not limited to, equipment standards, driver licensing requirements, maximum driving and on-duty hours provisions, log book requirements, drug and alcohol testing, maintenance of vehicles, and any driver or vehicle standards specified in Division 14.8 (commencing with Section 34500).

(4) Truck tractors exempt from registration under this subdivision are subject to the fees imposed under Sections 9250, 9250.8, and 9250.13, and to any other vehicle fees that are imposed by statute on or after January 1, 1998, that are deposited in the Motor Vehicle Account.

(e) A trailer that is equipped with a plenum chamber for the drying of agricultural commodities.

(f) Except as provided in subdivision (j) of Section 36005, a trap wagon, as defined in Section 36016, that is equipped with a fuel tank or tanks. The fuel tank or tanks shall not exceed 3,000 gallons total capacity.

(g) A forklift truck, operated by a farmer not for compensation. For purposes of this section, a hay-squeeze shall be deemed a forklift.

(h) A truck tractor or truck tractor and semitrailer combination specified in this subdivision that is owned by a farmer and operated on the highways only incidental to a farming operation and not for compensation. This subdivision applies only to truck tractors with a manufacturer’s gross vehicle weight rating over 10,000 pounds that are equipped with all-wheel drive and off-highway traction tires on all wheels, and only to semitrailers used in combination with that truck tractor and exclusively in the production or harvesting of melons. The vehicles specified in this subdivision shall not be operated in excess of 25 miles per hour on the highways.

The Commissioner of the California Highway Patrol may, by regulation, prohibit the vehicles specified in this subdivision from operating on specific routes. These vehicles shall not be operated laden on the highway for more than two miles from the point of origin and shall not be operated for more than 30 miles unladen on the highway from the point of origin. These vehicles shall not be operated for more than 15 miles unladen on the highway from the point of origin, unless accompanied by an escort vehicle to the front, and an escort vehicle to the rear.

(i) A motor vehicle specifically designed for, and used exclusively in, an agricultural operation for purposes of carrying, or returning empty from carrying, silage that is operated by a farmer, an employee of the farmer, or a contracted employee of the farmer between one part of a farm to another part of that farm or from one farm to another farm, on a highway for a distance not to exceed 20 miles from the point of origin of the trip. This subdivision does not include a vehicle that is used for the transportation of silage for retail sales.

For the purposes of this subdivision, “silage” includes field corn, sorghum, grass, legumes, cereals, or cereal mixes, either green or mature, converted into feed for livestock.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 877, Sec. 74.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

36102.

The following vehicles are exempt from registration if they have and display identification plates, as specified in Section 5014; and these vehicles, except when operated pursuant to subdivision (k) of Section 36005, shall not be deemed to be implements of husbandry and they shall be subject to all equipment and device requirements as if registered:

(a) An automatic bale wagon operated unladen on a highway.

(b) An automatic bale wagon when transporting baled hay or straw for a distance of not more than five continuous road miles on a highway from one parcel of property owned, leased, or controlled by a farmer to another parcel of property owned, leased, or controlled by such farmer.

(c) A motor vehicle which is designed for, and used exclusively to, haul feed for livestock and which is owned and operated exclusively by a farmer or an employee of a farmer. A vehicle exempted by this subdivision may be operated only on those highways that are maintained by local authorities, only pursuant to a permit issued as provided in Section 35780 by the local authority having jurisdiction over the highways used, and only for a distance of not more than five continuous road miles from one parcel of property owned, leased, or controlled by the farmer to another parcel of property owned, leased, or controlled by the farmer. This subdivision does not apply to transportation for compensation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1077, Sec. 12.5.   Operative July 1, 1985, by Sec. 21 of Ch. 1077.)
-------------------------------------------

36105.

A trailer or semitrailer owned and used exclusively by a farmer to haul his or her own implements of husbandry, portable sanitary facility, shade trailer, or tools used exclusively for the production or harvesting of agricultural products is exempt from registration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 168, Sec. 4.   (AB 2111)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

36109.

“Farm trailers,” as defined in Section 36010, having a gross weight of 10,000 pounds or less, are exempt from registration except that Section 5014 shall apply to such trailers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 861, Sec. 57.   Effective September 29, 2000.   Operative December 31, 2001, pursuant to Sec. 67 of Ch. 861.)
-------------------------------------------

36115.

(a) Any person who owns an implement of husbandry which is exempt from registration may obtain an identification plate as provided in Section 5014 for the implement.

(b) The department shall issue an identification plate as applied for to any manufacturer or dealer of an implement of husbandry which is exempt from registration as provided in Section 5016.5. That manufacturer or dealer may obtain more than one plate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1077, Sec. 14.   Operative July 1, 1985, by Sec. 21 of Ch. 1077.)
-------------------------------------------

36130.

(a) On and after January 1, 1986, original applications for identification plates on vehicles specified in Division 16 (commencing with Section 36000) shall be submitted pursuant to Section 5014 or Section 5016.5.

(b) Effective January 1, 1986, identification plates that expired on December 31, 1983, shall not be eligible for renewal. Applicants shall apply for identification plates pursuant to Section 5014 or Section 5016.5.

(c) Commencing with 1987 renewals, all expiring identification plates are canceled and owners of vehicles defined in Division 16 (commencing with Section 36000), that are required to display these plates, shall submit applications pursuant to Section 5014 or Section 5016.5.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1077, Sec. 19.   Operative July 1, 1985, by Sec. 21 of Ch. 1077.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Drivers’ Licenses [36300. - 36305.]

36300.

Any person, while driving or operating an implement of husbandry incidentally operated or moved over a highway is not required to obtain a driver’s license; except that the driver of any farm tractor while being used to draw a farm trailer carrying farm produce between farms or from a farm to a processing or handling point and return, and the driver of an automatic bale wagon which is being operated as specified in Section 36102, but is not being operated as provided in subdivision (k) of Section 36005, shall be in possession of a driver’s license of the appropriate class other than a junior permit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 627.)
-------------------------------------------

36305.

The driver of any implement of husbandry shall possess a valid class C driver’s license when operating a combination of vehicles at a speed in excess of 25 miles per hour or towing any implement of husbandry as specified in subdivision (d), (e), or (j) of Section 36005.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 272, Sec. 55.   Effective August 2, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Speed Laws [36400. - 36400.]

36400.

No person shall move or drive a lift-carrier or other vehicle designed and used exclusively for the lifting and carrying of implements of husbandry or tools used exclusively for the production or harvesting of agricultural products at a speed in excess of 35 miles per hour.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1135.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Equipment of Implements of Husbandry [36500. - 36520.]

36500.

The provisions of Sections 24012, 24250, 24251, 24400 to 24404, inclusive, and Articles 3 (commencing with Section 24600), 4 (commencing with Section 24800), 5 (commencing with Section 24950), 6 (commencing with Section 25100), 9 (commencing with Section 25350), 11 (commencing with Section 25450), and 13 (commencing with Section 25650) of Chapter 2 of Division 12 shall not apply to implements of husbandry. Such vehicles shall be subject to the provisions of Sections 24254, 24615, 25803, and 25950, and Article 12 (commencing with Section 25500) of Chapter 2 of Division 12.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 618.)
-------------------------------------------

36505.

Farm tractors as defined in Section 36015, and trailers displaying an identification plate, as provided for in Section 36115 or 36130, when operated during darkness shall not be exempted from the provisions of Sections 24400 and 25100.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 124, Sec. 139.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

36508.

After July 1, 1970, no new implement of husbandry designed or intended by the manufacturer to be operated or moved at a speed not in excess of 25 miles per hour shall be sold in this state unless it is equipped by the manufacturer with a slow-moving vehicle emblem as prescribed by Section 24615, and such an emblem shall thereafter be displayed and maintained on such implement of husbandry while the implement is able to be operated upon a public highway.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 949.)
-------------------------------------------

36509.

(a) An implement of husbandry, a farm vehicle, or any vehicle escorting or towing an implement of husbandry or farm vehicle, may display flashing amber warning lamps or flashing amber turn signals:

(1) When the vehicle is required to display a “slow moving vehicle” emblem as defined in Section 24615.

(2) When the width, length, height, or speed of the vehicle may cause a hazard to other traffic on the highway.

(b) An implement of husbandry, a farm vehicle, or any vehicle towing an implement of husbandry or farm vehicle, when the load upon the vehicle exceeds 120 inches in width, shall display either:

(1) Flashing amber warning lamps.

(2) Flashing amber turn signals.

(3) During daylight hours, red flags, each of which shall be not less than 16 inches square, mounted at the left and right outer extremities of the vehicle or load whichever has the greater horizontal dimension.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 973, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

36510.

Implements of husbandry are not subject to stopping distance requirements contained in Section 26454, but if any such vehicle cannot be stopped within 32 feet from an initial speed of 15 miles per hour, it shall not be operated at a speed in excess of that permitting a stop in 32 feet.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 2149.)
-------------------------------------------

36515.

The provisions of Section 26700 relating to windshields shall not apply to implements of husbandry.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 2149.)
-------------------------------------------

36520.

The provisions of Section 26706 relating to windshield wipers shall not apply to implements of husbandry.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 2149.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Size, Weight and Load of Implements of Husbandry [36600. - 36627.]

36600.

(a) The limitations as to width as set forth in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 35100) of Division 15 do not apply to implements of husbandry incidentally operated, transported, towed, or otherwise moved over a highway.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), when an implement of husbandry is transported or moved over a highway which is a part of the National System of Interstate and Defense Highways (as referred to in Section 108 of the Federal-aid Highway Act of 1956) as a load on another vehicle, if the load exceeds 102 inches in width, the vehicle and load shall not be operated for a distance in excess of 25 miles from the point of origin of the trip. The operator of the transporting vehicle shall be a farmer or a person regularly employed by a farmer or farm corporation, and the operator transporting the load shall have in his or her immediate possession a writing signed by the farmer or farm corporation agent which states the origin and destination of the trip.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), when an implement of husbandry is transported or moved over any other highway as a load on another vehicle, if the load exceeds 120 inches in width, the vehicle and load shall not be operated for a distance in excess of 25 miles from the point of origin of the trip. The operator of the transporting vehicle shall be a farmer or a person employed by a farmer or farm corporation, and the operator transporting the load shall have in his or her immediate possession a writing signed by the farmer or farm corporation agent which states the origin and destination of the trip.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 103, Sec. 1.   Effective May 11, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

36605.

The limitations as to width, as set forth in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 35100) of Division 15, do not apply to any trailer or semitrailer, including lift carriers and tip-bed trailers, used exclusively for the transportation of implements of husbandry or tools used exclusively for the production or harvesting of agricultural products by farmers or implement dealers, except as follows:

(1) With respect to any trailer or semitrailer transporting a grain-harvesting combine, that vehicle shall not exceed a width of 144 inches.

(2) With respect to any other vehicle described in this section, that vehicle, or the load on that vehicle when that load consists of tools, shall not exceed a width of 120 inches.

(3) With respect to any trailer or semitrailer described in subdivision (c) of Section 36005, that vehicle, when towed upon a highway shall not exceed a width of 174 inches and shall be subject to subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 36600.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 973, Sec. 13.)
-------------------------------------------

36606.

(a) The limitations as to width, as set forth in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 35100) of Division 15, do not apply to automatic bale wagons while operated as specified in Section 36102, except that such vehicles or the load thereon may not exceed 120 inches in width.

(b) This section shall have no application to highways which are a part of the National System of Interstate and Defense Highways (as referred to in subdivision (a) of Section 108 of the Federal-Aid Highway Act of 1956).

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 627.)
-------------------------------------------

36610.

(a) The limitations as to height of vehicles contained in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 35250) of Division 15 do not apply to implements of husbandry incidentally operated, transported, towed, or otherwise moved over a highway.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), when an implement of husbandry is transported or moved over a highway as a load on another vehicle and the load exceeds 14 feet in height, the vehicle and load shall not be operated for a distance in excess of 25 miles from the point of origin of the trip. The operator of the transporting vehicle shall be a farmer or a person regularly employed by a farmer or farm corporation, and the operator transporting the vehicle shall have in his or her immediate possession a writing signed by the farmer or farm corporation agent which states the origin and destination of the trip.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 686, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

36615.

The limitations as to length of vehicles contained in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 35400) do not apply to implements of husbandry operated or moved over a highway incidental to agricultural operations. Notwithstanding Section 36626, when an implement of husbandry is operated in a combination of vehicles that exceeds the length requirements of Section 35401, the combination is limited to two vehicles in tandem.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 973, Sec. 14.)
-------------------------------------------

36625.

The provisions of Section 21715 do not apply to any vehicle drawing or towing unladen implements of husbandry.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 2149.)
-------------------------------------------

36626.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 21715, a motor truck with an unladen weight of not less than 3,500 pounds and a gross weight of not less than 4,200 pounds may tow a combination of two cotton trailers operated on the highways for the exclusive purpose of transporting cotton from a farm to a cotton gin and returning the empty trailers to such farm. Extra weight or ballast may be added to meet the requirements of this section and shall be in the form of 100-pound bags of sand.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

36627.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 21715, a motortruck with an unladen weight of not less than 3,500 pounds and a gross weight of not less than 4,200 pounds may tow a combination of two almond trailers operated on the highways for the exclusive purpose of transporting almonds from a farm to an almond huller and returning the empty trailers to such farm. Extra weight or ballast may be added to meet the requirements of this section and shall be in the form of 100-pound bags of sand.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 293.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7. Other Requirements [36700. - 36705.]

36700.

All implements of husbandry, farm trailers or any other vehicles subject to the provisions of this division, and any owner, operator or driver of such vehicles, shall also comply with and be subject to all other provisions of this code which are not in conflict with the specific provisions contained in this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 2149.)
-------------------------------------------

36705.

No automatic bale wagon exceeding 96 inches in width or carrying a load in excess of 100 inches in width may be operated on any highway during darkness.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 627.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 8. General Provisions [36800. - 36800.]

36800.

The provisions of this division, unless otherwise provided, apply to all vehicles, whether publicly or privately owned, when upon the highways.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 2149.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 16.5. OFF-HIGHWAY VEHICLES [38000. - 38604.]



CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [38000. - 38007.]

38000.

This division may be cited as the Chappie-Z'berg Off-Highway Motor Vehicle Law of 1971.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1816.)
-------------------------------------------

38001.

(a) Except as otherwise provided, this division applies to off-highway motor vehicles, as defined in Section 38006, on lands, other than a highway, that are open and accessible to the public, including any land acquired, developed, operated, or maintained, in whole or in part, with money from the Off-Highway Vehicle Trust Fund, except private lands under the immediate control of the owner or his or her agent where permission is required and has been granted to operate a motor vehicle. For purposes of this division, the term “highway” does
 not include fire trails, logging roads, service roads regardless of surface composition, or other roughly graded trails and roads upon which vehicular travel by the public is permitted.

(b) Privately owned and maintained parking facilities that are generally open to the public are exempt from this division, unless the facilities are specifically declared subject to this division by the procedure specified in Section 21107.8.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 563, Sec. 37.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

38006.

As used in this division, an “off-highway motor vehicle” is any of the following:

(a) A motor vehicle subject to the provisions of subdivision (a) of Section 38010.

(b) A motor vehicle registered under Section 4000, when such motor vehicle is operated on land to which this division has application.

(c) A motor vehicle owned or operated by a nonresident of this state, whether or not such motor vehicle is identified or registered in a foreign jurisdiction, when such motor vehicle is
 operated on lands to which this division has application.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1093.)
-------------------------------------------

38007.

The Off-Highway Motor Vehicle Recreation Division of the Department of Parks and Recreation shall adopt courses of instruction in off-highway motor vehicle safety, operation, and principles of environmental preservation by January 1, 2005. For this purpose the division shall consult with the Department of the California Highway Patrol and other public and private agencies or organizations. The division shall make this course of instruction available directly, through contractual agreement, or through volunteers authorized by the division to conduct a course of
 instruction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 563, Sec. 38.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Registration of Off-Highway Vehicles; Original and Renewal of Identification; Issuance of Certificates of Ownership [38010. - 38265.]



  ARTICLE 1. Motor Vehicles Subject to Identification [38010. - 38030.]

38010.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b), a motor vehicle specified in subdivision (b) of Section 38012 that is not registered under this code because it is to be operated or used exclusively off the highways, except as provided in this division, shall display an identification plate or device issued by the department.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not apply to
 any of the following:

(1) Motor vehicles specifically exempted from registration under this code, including, but not limited to, motor vehicles exempted pursuant to Sections 4006, 4010, 4012, 4013, 4015, 4018, and 4019.

(2) Implements of husbandry.

(3) Motor vehicles owned by the state, or any county, city, district, or political subdivision of the state, or the United States.

(4) Motor vehicles owned or operated by, or operated under contract with a utility, whether privately or publicly owned, when used as specified in Section 22512.

(5) Special construction equipment described in Section 565, regardless
 of whether those motor vehicles are used in connection with highway or railroad work.

(6) A motor vehicle with a currently valid special permit issued under Section 38087.5 that is owned or operated by a nonresident of this state and the vehicle is not identified or registered in a foreign jurisdiction. For the purposes of this paragraph, a person who holds a valid driver’s license issued by a foreign jurisdiction is presumed to be a nonresident.

(7) Commercial vehicles weighing more than 6,000 pounds unladen.

(8) A motorcycle manufactured in the year 1942 or prior.

(9) Four-wheeled motor vehicles operated solely in organized racing or competitive events upon
 a closed course when those events are conducted under the auspices of a recognized sanctioning body or by permit issued by the local governmental authority having jurisdiction.
